Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.555

Registration requirement.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership must register with the secretary of state in accordance with Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5114; 1998 c 103 s 1202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.